Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-304.03
Board of trustees; insure compliance with sections; manner.

The Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges shall inform the Director of Administrative Services that sections 82-317 to 82-329 and 85-304 to 85-304.03 have been complied with for projects under its supervision before a warrant may be issued for payment.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 16;

Laws 2022, LB887, § 4.